New York, session 2025-2026, A10516.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Upon a determination by the metropolitan transportation 2 authority or the New York city transit authority that sufficient funds 3 have been committed to it specifically for such purpose, the metropol- 4 itan transportation authority, the public benefit corporation created by 5 section 1263 of the public authorities law, and the New York city trans- 6 it authority, the public benefit corporation created by section 1201 of 7 the public authorities law, shall use such specifically committed funds 8 to rename the 103rd Street - Lexington Avenue subway station on the IRT 9 Lexington Avenue line of the New York city subway to the 103rd Street - 10 Cicely Tyson station. The metropolitan transportation authority shall 11 ensure that all signs and any other items issued by the metropolitan 12 transportation authority are updated to accurately reflect the new name 13 of the station. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 15 deemed repealed after the signs and any other items are accurately 16 updated. The chief executive officer of the metropolitan transportation 17 authority or president of the New York city transit authority shall 18 notify the legislative bill drafting commission upon the completion of 19 such updates in order that the commission may maintain an accurate and 20 timely effective data base of the official text of the laws of the state 21 of New York in furtherance of effectuating the provisions of section 44 22 of the legislative law and section 70-b of the public officers law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15082-02-6